src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
!****************************************************************************
!! # Adverbs
!
!! - E. Uí Dhonnchadha
!! - REMOVED FEB 2004: +Phr
!!  ADDED FEB 2004: +Temp 
!!  CHANGED +Gen to +Gn to avoid confusion with +Gen = genitive
!****************************************************************************


LEXICON Adverb  !!≈ **@CODE@**

! DIRECTIONAL

thart+Adv+Dir:thart	#;
suas+Adv+Dir:suas	#;
síos+Adv+Dir:síos	#;
anuas+Adv+Dir:anuas	#;
aníos+Adv+Dir:aníos	#;
thuas+Adv+Dir:thuas	#;
thíos+Adv+Dir:thíos	#;
thall+Adv+Dir:thall	#;
anall+Adv+Dir:anall	#;
anonn+Adv+Dir:anonn	#;
abhus+Adv+Dir:abhus	#;

trasna+Adv+Dir:trasna	#;

!!!tuaidh+Adv+Dir:tuaidh	#;
!!!tuaidh+Adv+Dir+Len:thuaidh	#;  ! add back in to adjectives e.g. Tiobraid Árainn Tuaidh, Cóiré Tuaidh
!!!<ó %_:%  t h u a i d h %+Adv:0 %+Dir:0>	#; ! removed Aug 2019 - not an adverb
aduaidh+Adv+Dir:aduaidh	#;

!!!deas+Adv+Dir:deas	#;
!!!<ó %_:%  d h e a s %+Adv:0 %+Dir:0>		# ! removed Aug 2019 - not an adverb
theas+Adv+Dir:theas	#;
aneas+Adv+Dir:aneas	#;

soir+Adv+Dir:soir	#;
thoir+Adv+Dir:thoir	#;
anoir+Adv+Dir:anoir	#;

siar+Adv+Dir:siar	#;
thiar+Adv+Dir:thiar	#;
aniar+Adv+Dir:aniar	#;

ann+Adv+Loc:ann		#;
anseo+Adv+Loc:anseo	#;
ansiúd+Adv+Loc:ansiúd	#;
anseo+Adv+Loc+NG:anso	#;
ansin+Adv+Loc:ansin	#;
ansin+Adv+Loc+NG:ansan	#;
ansin+Adv+Temp:ansin	#;
ansin+Adv+Temp+NG:ansan	#;
abhaile+Adv+Dir:abhaile	#;
amach+Adv+Dir:amach	#;
isteach+Adv+Dir:isteach	#;
amuigh+Adv+Loc:amuigh	#;
<t a o b h %_:%  a m u i g h %+Adv:0 %+Loc:0>	#;
istigh+Adv+Loc:istigh	#;
<t a o b h %_:%  i s t i g h %+Adv:0 %+Loc:0>	#;
lastuas+Adv+Loc:lastuas	#;	! above overhead
lastoir+Adv+Loc:lastoir	#;	! on the east side
lastuaidh+Adv+Loc:lastuaidh	#; 	! on the north side
lasmuigh+Adv+Loc:lasmuigh	#;
laistigh+Adv+Loc:laistigh	#;
timpeall+Adv+Dir:timpeall	#;
<a r %_:%  a i s %+Adv:0 %+Dir:0>     #; !!
!!Tobar
<f o c a l %_:%  a r %_:%  f h o c a l %+Adv:0>     #; !! word for word, i.e. literally (2019)
!!nuige+Adv+Dir:nuige	#; ! (Added CW 09/08) Adv Temporal is sufficient
!!nuige+Adv+Dir:nuig	#; ! (Added CW 09/08)

! GENERAL
araon+Adv+Gn:araon	#;
amú+Adv+Gn:amú		#;
amugha+Adv+Gn+NG:amugha		#; ! (Added CW 09/08) variation of amú
ámh+Adv+Gn:ámh		#;		! truly
fadó+Adv+Gn:fadó	#;		! long ago
fiú+Adv+Gn:fiú	#;		! leven
anois+Adv+Temp:anois	#;
anois+Adv+Temp:Anois	#;		! included as alternative to Prop Noun
arís+Adv+Gn:arís	#;
arís+Adv+Gn:aríst	#;
!! MOVED TO ADJ annamh+Adv+Gn:annamh	#;
cheana+Adv+Gn:cheana	#;
choíche+Adv+Gn:choíche	#;
choíche+Adv+Gn+NG:choidhche	#; !(Added CW 09/08)
choíche+Adv+Gn+NG:choidhchin	#; !(Added CW 09/08)
déanach+Adv+Gn:déanach	#;
fós+Adv+Gn:fós	#;
feasta+Adv+Gn:feasta	#;
minic+Adv+Gn:minic	#;
riamh+Adv+Gn:ariamh	#;
riamh+Adv+Gn:riamh	#;
uaireanta+Adv+Gn:uaireanta	#;
<d á %_:%  b h a r r %_:%  s i n %+Adv:0 %+Gn:0>   #;	! Manner Adv
<g o %_:%  l e o r %+Adv:0 %+Gn:0>	#;	! Manner Adv
<c h e a n a %_:%  f é i n %+Adv:0 %+Gn:0>	#;	! Manner Adv
<a %_:%  t h u i l l e a d h %+Adv:0 %+Gn:0>	#;	! Manner Adv
!! what about chomh mór/hálainn etc. etc. 
!!<c h o m h %_:%  m a i t h %+Adv:0 %+Gn:0>	#;	! Manner Adv
!!Tobar
<i %_ m e a s c %+Adv:0 %+Gn:0>	#;	! Manner Adv
<i n %_ a i r d e %+Adv:0 %+Gn:0>	#;	! Manner Adv
chuige+Adv+Gn:chuige	#; !(Added CW 09/08)
chuige+Adv+Gn+NG:chuigint	#; !(Added CW 09/08)
chuige+Adv+Gn+NG:chuigis	#; !(Added CW 09/08)
eadhon+Adv+Gn:eadhon	#; !(Added CW 09/08) Lit: Namely
eadhón+Adv+Gn:eadhón	#; !(Added CW 09/08) Lit: Namely
trá+Adv+Gn:trá	#; ! (Added CW 09/08) Lit: Then, indeed
trá+Adv+Gn:tra	#; ! (Added CW 09/08) Lit: Then, indeed

inniu+Adv+Temp:inniu	#;
inniu+Adv+Temp+NG:inniubh	#; !(Added CW 09/08)
inniu+Adv+Temp+Gen+Sg:innibh	#; !(Added CW 09/08)
inné+Adv+Temp:inné	#;
amárach+Adv+Temp:amárach	#;
amárach+Adv+Temp+NG:amáireach	#;
anocht+Adv+Temp:anocht	#;
aréir+Adv+Temp:aréir	#;
anuraidh+Adv+Temp:anuraidh	#;
istoíche+Adv+Temp:istoíche	#;
<l e %_:%  g a i r i d %+Adv:0 %+Temp:0>	#;	! lately; Temporal Adv
<t h a r %_:%  a %_:%  b h e i t h %+Adv:0 %+Its:0>	#;	! Its Adv
túisce+Adv+Temp:túisce	#; ! (Added CW 09/08)
amainiris+Adv+Temp:amainiris	#; ! The second day after tomorrow (Added CW 09/08)
amairinis+Adv+Temp:amairinis	#; ! Variation of amainiris
nuige+Adv+Temp:nuige	#; ! (Added CW 09/08)
nuige+Adv+Temp+NG:nuig	#; ! (Added CW 09/08)

amhlaidh+Adv+Gn:amhlaidh	#;
beagnach+Adv+Gn:beagnach	#;
dáiríre+Adv+Gn:dáiríre	#; ! 
dáiríre+Adv+Gn+NG:dáirírí	#; ! (Added CW 09/08)
dáiríre+Adv+Gn+NG:dáiríribh	#; ! (Added CW 09/08)
fosta+Adv+Gn:fosta	#;
freisin+Adv+Gn:freisin	#;
áfach+Adv+Gn:áfach	#;
arú+Adv+Gn:arú	#;

!! see PART-LEX.TXT (etc.) for following
!!ní+Adv+Gn:ní	#;
!!nach+Adv+Gn:nach	#;
!!ná+Adv+Gn:ná	#;
!!níor+Adv+Gn:níor	#;
!!nár+Adv+Gn:nár	#;


! INTERROGATIVE
!!cá+Cop+Adv+Q:cá		#;
!!cá+Cop+Adv+Q+Past:cár	#;
!!cá+Cop+Adv+Q:cár	#;
!!cá+Cop+Adv+Q:cárb	#;
!!cá+Cop+Adv+Q:cárbh	#;

!!cá+Adv+Q:cá		#;
!!cá+Adv+Q+Past:cár	#;
!!cá+Adv+Q:cár	#;
!!cá+Adv+Q:cárb	#;
!!cá+Adv+Q:cárbh	#;
!!cathain+Adv+Q:cathain	#;
!!conas+Adv+Q:conas	#;

cá+Adv+Q+Wh:cá		#;
cá+Adv+Q+Wh+Past:cár	#;
cá+Adv+Q+Wh:cár		#;
cá+Adv+Q+Wh:cárb	#;
cá+Adv+Q+Wh:cárbh	#;
cathain+Adv+Q+Wh:cathain	#;
conas+Adv+Q+Wh:conas	#;

cá+Adv+Q+Wh+NG:cáit		#; ! cáit = cá háit - Bardic historical
cá+Adv+Q+Wh+NG:cáid		#; ! cáid = cá fhad - Bardic historical

! DEGREE (INTENSIFIERS OF ADJECTIVES)

ach		Its;   ! as in "ach amháin" and "ach sinne amháin"
sách		Its;
iontach		Its;
measartha	Its;
réasúnta 	Its;
cuíosach	Its;
sonraíoch	Its;
breá		Its;
milteannach	Its;
cineál		Its;
bunús		Its;
chóir		Its;
damanta		Its;
deas		Its;
diabhalta	Its;
fiánta		Its;
chomh		Its;
chomh:cho	Its;
chomh:comh	Its;
chomh:chó	Its;
<t h a r %_:%  a %_:%  b h e i t h %+Adv:0 %+Its:0>	#;	! Its Adv
	
LEXICON Its
+Adv+Its:	#;
